Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1698.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2717(b)(2) of Title 18 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2717. Terrorism.* * *(b) Grading and penalty.--* * *(2) If the violent offense is a felony of the first degree, a person convicted of an offense under this section shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment fixed by the court [at not more than 40 years] up to a maximum term of life imprisonment and may be sentenced to pay a fine of not more than $100,000.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.12345678910111213141516171819